pl: Norma certyfikacji tratwy ratunkowej: ISO 9650-1 (typ 1); ISO 9650-2 (typ 2); SOLAS; Zatwierdzenie Transport Canada; Zatwierdzenie USCG; Inne
tr: Can kurtarma salı sertifikasyon standardı: ISO 9650-1 (Tip 1); ISO 9650-2 (Tip 2); SOLAS; Transport Canada Onaylı; USCG Onaylı; Diğer
ro-RO: Standard de certificare a plutei de salvare: ISO 9650-1 (Tipul 1); ISO 9650-2 (Tipul 2); SOLAS; Aprobat de Transport Canada; Aprobat de USCG; Altele
ja: ライフラフト認証標準: ISO 9650-1 (Type 1); ISO 9650-2 (Type 2); SOLAS; カナダ運輸省承認; USCG承認; その他
ru: Стандарт сертификации спасательного плота: ISO 9650-1 (тип 1); ISO 9650-2 (тип 2); SOLAS; Одобрено Transport Canada; Одобрено USCG; Другое
cs: Norma pro certifikaci záchranných člunů: ISO 9650-1 (typ 1); ISO 9650-2 (typ 2); SOLAS; Schváleno Transport Canada; Schváleno USCG; Jiné
hu: Mentőcsónak tanúsítási szabványa: ISO 9650-1 (1. típus); ISO 9650-2 (2. típus); SOLAS; Transport Canada által jóváhagyott; USCG által jóváhagyott; Egyéb
es: Estándar de certificación de la balsa salvavidas: ISO 9650-1 (tipo 1); ISO 9650-2 (tipo 2); SOLAS; Aprobado por Transport Canada; Aprobado por USCG; Otro
sv: Certifieringsstandard för livflotte: ISO 9650-1 (typ 1); ISO 9650-2 (typ 2); SOLAS; Godkänd av Transport Canada; Godkänd av USCG; Övrigt
pt-PT: Norma de certificação do botes salva-vidas: ISO 9650-1 (tipo 1); ISO 9650-2 (tipo 2); SOLAS; Aprovado pela Transport Canada; Aprovado pela USCG; Outro
lt-LT: Gelbėjimo plaustų sertifikavimo standartas: ISO 9650-1 (1 tipas); ISO 9650-2 (2 tipas); SOLAS; Patvirtinta „Transport Canada“; Patvirtinta USCG; Kita
hr-HR: Standard certificiranja splavi za spašavanje: ISO 9650-1 (tip 1); ISO 9650-2 (tip 2); SOLAS; Odobrio Transport Canada; Odobrio USCG; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стандарт за сертификация на спасителен сал: ISO 9650-1 (Тип 1); ISO 9650-2 (Тип 2); SOLAS; Одобрен от Transport Canada; Одобрен от USCG; Друг
ko: 구명뗏목 인증 표준: ISO 9650-1 (유형 1); ISO 9650-2 (유형 2); SOLAS; Transport Canada 승인; USCG 승인; 기타
fr: Norme de certification des radeaux de sauvetage: ISO 9650-1 (type 1); ISO 9650-2 (type 2); SOLAS; Approuvé par Transports Canada; Approuvé par l’USCG; Autre
pt-BR: Norma de certificação da balsa salva-vidas: ISO 9650-1 (Tipo 1); ISO 9650-2 (Tipo 2); SOLAS; Aprovado pela Transport Canada; Aprovado pela USCG; Outro
th: มาตรฐานการรับรองแพชูชีพ: ISO 9650-1 (ประเภท 1); ISO 9650-2 (ประเภท 2); SOLAS; ผ่านการรับรองโดย Transport Canada; ผ่านการรับรองโดย USCG; อื่นๆ
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận xuồng cứu sinh: ISO 9650-1 (Loại 1); ISO 9650-2 (Loại 2); SOLAS; Chứng nhận Transport Canada; Chứng nhận USCG; Khác
sl-SI: Standard za certificiranje na področju varnosti za rešilne slapove: ISO 9650-1 (Type 1); ISO 9650-2 (Type 2); SOLAS; Odobreno s strani Transport Canada; Odobreno s strani USCG; Drugo
de: Zertifizierungsstandard für Rettungsboote: ISO 9650-1 (Typ 1); ISO 9650-2 (Typ 2); SOLAS; Durch Transport Canada zugelassen; USCG-Zulassung; Sonstige
da: Standard for certificering af redningsflåder: ISO 9650-1 (type 1); ISO 9650-2 (type 2); SOLAS; Godkendt af Transport Canada; USCG-godkendt; Andet
zh-TW: 救生衣認證標準: ISO 9650-1 (第 1 類); ISO 9650-2 (第 2 類); SOLAS; 加拿大交通部核准; 美國海岸巡防隊 (USCG) 核准; 其他
sk-SK: Certifikačná norma záchranného člna: ISO 9650-1 (typ 1); ISO 9650-2 (typ 2); SOLAS; Schválené Transport Canada; Schválené USCG; Iné
el: Πρότυπο πιστοποίησης σωσίβιας σχεδίας: ISO 9650-1 (Type 1); ISO 9650-2 (Type 2); SOLAS; Εγκεκριμένο από Transport Canada; Εγκεκριμένο από USCG; Άλλο
zh-CN: 救生筏认证标准: ISO 9650-1（1 型）; ISO 9650-2（2 型）; SOLAS; 加拿大交通部批准; USCG 批准; 其他
nl: Certificeringsnorm reddingsvlotten: ISO 9650-1 (Type 1); ISO 9650-2 (Type 2); SOLAS; Transport Canada-goedgekeurd; USCG-goedgekeurd; Overige
fi: Pelastuslautan turvallisuussertifiointistandardi: ISO 9650-1 (tyyppi 1); ISO 9650-2 (tyyppi 2); SOLAS; Transport Canadan hyväksymä; USCG:n hyväksymä; Muu
nb: Sertifiseringsstandard for redningsflåte: ISO 9650-1 (Type 1); ISO 9650-2 (Type 2); SOLAS; Godkjent av Transport Canada; USCG-godkjent; Annet
it: Standard di certificazione della zattera di salvataggio: ISO 9650-1 (tipo 1); ISO 9650-2 (tipo 2); SOLAS; Approvazione Transport Canada; Approvazione USCG; Altro
en: Life raft certification standard: ISO 9650-1 (Type 1); ISO 9650-2 (Type 2); SOLAS; Transport Canada Approved; USCG Approved; Other